Utah statutes.
16-6a-826.   Common members, directors, or officers.

(1)  Two or more nonprofit corporations may have members, directors, or officers that are common to each nonprofit corporation.

(2)  The fact of common members, directors, or officers in two or more nonprofit corporations may not, by itself, create an inference that the nonprofit corporations individually or collectively:

(a)  are agents or alter egos of one another; or

(b)  have been formed or availed of, for an improper purpose.

(3)  The doctrine of "piercing the corporate veil" may not be applied to one or more nonprofit corporations solely because of the fact of common members, directors, or officers.



Amended by Chapter 127, 2001 General Session

